Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 14-127A of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education shall establish a two-
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1480 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

year apprenticeship pilot program to encourage participation in
youth apprenticeship programs.
B. The Department shall designate two technology center school
districts to coordinate with public school districts in this state
to make apprenticeship opportunities available to students.
C. A technology center school district designated to
participate in the pilot program created pursuant to this section
shall designate a district employee to serve as an apprenticeship
coordinator. The duties of an apprenticeship coordinator shall
include, but not be limited to:
1. Building relationships with employers in the area served by
the technology center school district to maximize availability of
apprenticeship opportunities;
2. Facilitating high school student participation in
apprenticeship opportunities; and
3. Coordinating with public school districts participating in
the pilot program.
D. Students who are age sixteen (16) and older and enrolled in
a public school district participating in the pilot program may
participate in an apprenticeship opportunity and may be paid for
work conducted as part of an apprenticeship opportunity.
E. 1. Public school districts and students that participate in
an apprenticeship opportunity pursuant to this section shall agree
to indemnify and hold harmless employers offering the apprenticeship
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1480 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

oppo rtunity from claims arising from student participation except in
cases of gross negligence, willful misconduct, or a clear violation
of law.
2. Public school districts and students who are age eighteen
(18) and older or the parents or legal guardians of students who are
under the age of eighteen (18) shall execute an apprenticeship
participation agreement that indemnifies participating employers
from claims arising from student participation in an approved
apprenticeship opportunity. The Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education shall prescribe the apprenticeship
participation agreement form required by this subsection.
F. The Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education
shall electronically submit a report to the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives by December 1, 2028, that includes an evaluation of
the pilot program by participating public school districts and
technology center school districts, data on whether the pilot
program had an impact on increasing student participation in
apprenticeship opportunities, and recommendations for continuation
of the program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1480 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 3, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1480 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)